Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1219YH (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. 121 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Develop and distribute to school 3 districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter schools, 4 innovation zone schools, and area education agencies resources 5 that will allow employees of the school district, accredited 6 nonpublic school, charter school, innovation zone school, 7 or area education agency to furnish testing services to 8 students to assist the parents or guardians of such students in 9 submitting an application for home and community-based services 10 waivers to the department of health and human services. 11 Sec. 2. Section 273.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. The area education agency may furnish 14 testing services to pupils enrolled in public or nonpublic 15 schools which are on the list of accredited schools pursuant 16 to section 256.11, which request to receive such services, to 17 assist the parents or guardians of such pupils in submitting an 18 application for home and community-based services waivers to 19 the department of health and human services. 20